Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF37.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT PROPOSED.new text end new text begin An amendment to the Minnesota Constitution is proposed to the people. If the amendment is adopted, a section shall be added to article I, to read: new text end new text begin Sec. 18. new text end new text begin Elections shall be free, fair, and equal. No civil or military power shall, at any time, interfere with the free exercise of the right to vote. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin SUBMISSION TO VOTERS.new text end new text begin (a) The proposed amendment must be submitted to the people at the 2026 general election. If ratified, the amendment is effective January 1, 2027. The question submitted must be: new text end new text begin "Shall the Minnesota Constitution be amended to provide for free, fair, and equal elections and prohibit civil and military powers from interfering with the right to vote? new text end new text begin Yes . new text end new text begin No . new text end new text begin " new text end new text begin (b) The title required under Minnesota Statutes, section 204D.15, subdivision 1, for the question submitted to the people under paragraph (a) shall be: "Free, Fair, and Equal Elections." new text end